Hawaii statutes.
§657-34 Disabilities. If, when right
of entry or of action first accrues as aforesaid, the person entitled to the
entry or action is within the age of eighteen years, or insane, or imprisoned,
such person, or anyone claiming from, by, or under the person, may make the
entry or bring the action at any time within five years after the disability is
removed, notwithstanding the twenty years before limited in that behalf, have
expired. [L 1870, c 22, §4; am L 1898, c 19, §3; RL 1925, §2660; RL 1935,
§3931; RL 1945, §10442; RL 1955, §241-33; HRS §657-34; am L 1972, c 2, §37(2)
and c 105, §1(o); am L 1979, c 105, §62; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Infancy does not affect rule requiring reasonable attention
to property and rights. 16 H. 228 (1904).

Disabilities of heirs when statute has started running. 18
H. 662 (1907).

Conveyance to minors. 24 H. 1 (1917).

Disaffirmance by minor. 30 H. 184 (1927).

These exceptions cannot be engrafted on §667-13 to extend
period of redemption thereunder. 45 H. 505, 371 P.2d 217 (1962).

Cited: 19 H. 474, 480 (1909).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next